District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.02

Benefit program study.

Within 18 months after March 3, 1979, the Mayor shall transmit a study to the Council concerning development of a program of disability income protection to be made available to employees through collective bargaining and a program of low cost legal services for employees.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2202, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-623.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-352.2.